Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-1818
Metropolitan transit authority; receipts; disbursements; books of account.

The board shall provide by resolution for the manner of handling all receipts, the depositing of same in banks, and the investment of same when practicable, and of all disbursements, and shall provide for the keeping of accurate books of account of all of same.

Laws 1957, c. 23, § 18, p. 172;

Laws 1972, LB 1275, § 15.